Massachusetts, session 194th, H3522.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 25A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 11F1/2 the following section:-
Section 11F 2/3. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Carbon intensity”, the quantity of lifecycle greenhouse gas emissions associated with a
unit of specific transportation fuel expressed in grams of carbon dioxide equivalent per
megajoule of transportation fuel.
“Clean fuel”, transportation fuel with a carbon intensity level that is below the clean fuels
carbon intensity standard in a given year.
of 4

“Credit”, a unit of measurement equal to 1 metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent that
serves as a quantitative measure of the degree to which a fuel provider’s transportation fuel
volume is lower than the carbon intensity established by the clean fuel standard.
"Credit generator", a transportation fuel provider of a clean fuel for use in the
commonwealth which, if the electricity is to be used as a transportation fuel, may include, but
shall not be limited to including, automakers, electric charging providers, electric utilities and
electric vehicle fleet operators.
“Deficit”, a quantitative measure of the degree to which a fuel provider’s volume of
transportation fuel is greater than the carbon intensity than permissible according to the annual
clean fuel standard.
“Full fuels lifecycle”, the aggregate of greenhouse gas emissions, including direct
emissions and significant indirect emissions including, but not limited to, significant emissions
from land use changes as determined by Argonne National Laboratory’s Greenhouse Gases,
Regulated Emissions, and Energy Use in Technologies model or subsequent prevailing standard.
“Transportation fuel provider”, an entity that functions as an importer, blender, refiner,
producer or wholesale retailer of transportation fuels or as a retailer of a clean fuel.
(b)(1) The department shall establish a clean fuel standard that: (i) reduces the aggregate
carbon intensity of transportation fuels by 80 per cent from 1990 levels by 2050; (ii) establishes a
mechanism for the generation and trading of credits at a market-based rate to offset carbon
deficits; and (iii) supports clean energy and accessible transportation projects in disadvantaged
communities.
of 4

(2) The department shall establish an annual schedule to phase in implementation of the
clean fuel standard’s carbon intensity reduction that considers the: (i) cost of compliance; (ii)
technologies available to fuel providers; and (iii) need to maintain fuel quality and availability;
provided, however, that the aggregate carbon intensity of a transportation fuel shall be measured
on a full fuels lifecycle basis; and provided further, that the full fuels lifecycle shall be assessed
annually.
(c)(1) The clean fuel standard shall establish a mechanism that assigns credits to
transportation fuel providers whose fuel or fuels’ carbon intensity is below the standards adopted
by the department and a market for the trading of credits at a market-based rate. Credits shall be
quantified based on the total emissions across the lifecycle of the provider’s fuel or fuels and the
annual maximum allowable carbon emission intensity for that year; provided, however, that such
credits may be applied to future obligations or be traded on a market mechanism established by
the department to satisfy or offset compliance obligations of transportation fuel providers
incurring a deficit.
(2) Fuel providers subject to the clean fuel standard shall comply by importing, blending,
refining or wholesaling transportation fuels with an average aggregate carbon intensity that is at
or below the standard as determined by the department or by purchasing credits to offset any
aggregate deficit incurred from transportation fuels exceeding the average carbon intensity
standard for that year.
(d) Public entities serving as credit generators including, but not limited to, utilities and
state agencies, shall invest or direct a percentage, as determined by the department, of the
entity’s overall credit value to support clean energy and accessible transportation projects in
of 4

disadvantaged communities beyond existing local, federal and state incentives. The department
shall establish criteria for projects and goals in consultation with credit generators, communities,
community leaders and environmental justice advocates.
(e) The clean fuel standard shall not apply to fuels for aviation, railroad locomotives,
military vehicles or interstate waterborne vessels to the extent such standards are preempted by
federal laws or regulations.
(f) Transportation fuel providers of clean fuels for aviation, rail locomotives, military
vehicles, and interstate waterborne vessels shall be eligible to voluntarily generate credits.
(g) The department shall promulgate rules, regulations, plans, proposals, procedures and
administrative fees as necessary and appropriate to effectuate a clean fuel standard and credit
marketplace to ensure compliance with this section and offset the costs of implementation of the
clean fuel standard.
of 4